Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1309
Owner in another state; property not presumed abandoned; when.

If specific property which is subject to the provisions of sections 69-1302 and 69-1305 to 69-1308 is held for or owed or distributable to an owner whose last-known address is in another state by a holder who is subjected to the jurisdiction of that state, the specific property is not presumed abandoned in this state and subject to sections 69-1301 to 69-1329 if:

(a) It may be claimed as abandoned or escheated under the laws of such other state; and

(b) The laws of such other state make reciprocal provision that similar specific property is not presumed abandoned or escheatable by such other state when held for or owed or distributable to an owner whose last-known address is within this state by a holder who is subject to the jurisdiction of this state.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 9, p. 2483.